Washington statutes.
RCW 19.29.030

Time for compliance.

All wires, cables, poles, electric fixtures and appliances of every kind being used or operated at the time of the passage of this chapter, shall be changed, and made to conform to the provisions of this chapter, on or before the 1st day of July, 1940: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That the director of labor and industries of Washington shall have power, upon reasonable notice, to order and require the erection of all guards, protective devices, and methods of protection which in the judgment of the director are necessary and should be constructed previous to the expiration of the time fixed in this section: PROVIDED FURTHER, That nothing in this chapter shall apply to manholes already constructed, except the provisions for guards, sanitary conditions, drainage and safety appliances specified in *rules 20, 24, 26, 29, 30, 31 and 32.

[ 1937 c 105 s 1; 1931 c 24 s 1; 1921 c 20 s 1; 1917 c 41 s 1; 1913 c 130 s 3; RRS s 5437.] [1954 SLC-RO-29.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 19.29.010 was amended by 1987 c 79 s 1, changing rules 20, 24, 26, 29, 31, and 32 to rules 18, 22, 24, 27, 28, and 29, respectively, and deleting rule 30.